Utah statutes.
73-18-8.1.   Capacity and certification label.

(1)  Each vessel manufactured after November 1, 1972, which is less than 20 feet in length, except a sailboat, canoe, kayak, inflatable vessel, or homemade motor boat must have a United States Coast Guard capacity and certification label permanently affixed to the vessel and clearly visible to the operator when boarding or operating the vessel.  The capacity and certification information may be combined together and displayed on one label.

(2)  No person shall operate, or give permission for the operation of, any vessel on the waters of this state if it is loaded or powered in excess of the maximum capacity information on the United States Coast Guard capacity label.

(3)  No person shall alter, deface, or remove any United States Coast Guard capacity or certification information label affixed to a vessel.

(4)  No person shall operate, or give permission for the operation of, a vessel on the waters of this state if the required United States Coast Guard capacity or certification information label has been altered, defaced, or removed.

